incubator/apertium-sme-smj.sme.dix
    <pardef n="Báhčave/adji__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adjin</l>
          <r>adji<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajiin</l>
          <r>adji<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adjái</l>
          <r>adji<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adji</l>
          <r>adji<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aje</l>
          <r>adji<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aji</l>
          <r>adji<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajis</l>
          <r>adji<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiiguin</l>
          <r>adji<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiide</l>
          <r>adji<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajit</l>
          <r>adji<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiid</l>
          <r>adji<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiid</l>
          <r>adji<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiin</l>
          <r>adji<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Emeto/aivi__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aivin</l>
          <r>aivi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aivviin</l>
          <r>aivi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aivái</l>
          <r>aivi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aivi</l>
          <r>aivi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aivve</l>
          <r>aivi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aivvi</l>
          <r>aivi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aivvis</l>
          <r>aivi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivviiguin</l>
          <r>aivi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivviide</l>
          <r>aivi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aivvit</l>
          <r>aivi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivviid</l>
          <r>aivi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivviid</l>
          <r>aivi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivviin</l>
          <r>aivi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Sámeea/na__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nan</l>
          <r>na<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tnamiin</l>
          <r>na<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tnamii</l>
          <r>na<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>na<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tnama</l>
          <r>na<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tnama</l>
          <r>na<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tnamis</l>
          <r>na<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tnamiiguin</l>
          <r>na<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tnamiidda</l>
          <r>na<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tnamat</l>
          <r>na<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tnamiid</l>
          <r>na<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tnamiid</l>
          <r>na<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tnamiin</l>
          <r>na<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Deanule/ahki__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ahkin</l>
          <r>ahki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agiin</l>
          <r>ahki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ahkái</l>
          <r>ahki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ahki</l>
          <r>ahki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>age</l>
          <r>ahki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agi</l>
          <r>ahki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agis</l>
          <r>ahki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giiguin</l>
          <r>ahki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giide</l>
          <r>ahki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agit</l>
          <r>ahki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giid</l>
          <r>ahki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giid</l>
          <r>ahki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giin</l>
          <r>ahki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Estteeana"><i>Estteea</i><par n="Sámeea/na__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Emetoaivi"><i>Emeto</i><par n="Emeto/aivi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Gálddoaivi"><i>Gálddo</i><par n="Emeto/aivi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Gámehiseana"><i>Gámehisea</i><par n="Sámeea/na__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Gáldooaivi"><i>Gáldoo</i><par n="Emeto/aivi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Gieddeoaivi"><i>Gieddeo</i><par n="Emeto/aivi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Geavgŋoaivi"><i>Geavgŋo</i><par n="Emeto/aivi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Naga#eana"><i>Naga#ea</i><par n="Sámeea/na__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Báhčaveadji"><i>Báhčave</i><par n="Báhčave/adji__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Beahceleahki"><i>Beahcele</i><par n="Deanule/ahki__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ruonáeana"><i>Ruonáea</i><par n="Sámeea/na__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Sámeeana"><i>Sámeea</i><par n="Sámeea/na__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Sámieana"><i>Sámiea</i><par n="Sámeea/na__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Stuorraoaivi"><i>Stuorrao</i><par n="Emeto/aivi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Thaieana"><i>Thaiea</i><par n="Sámeea/na__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Davvebađaeana"><i>Davvebađaea</i><par n="Sámeea/na__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Davvi-Ruonáeana"><i>Davvi-Ruonáea</i><par n="Sámeea/na__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Deanuleahki"><i>Deanule</i><par n="Deanule/ahki__N_Prop"/></e>
